Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9A.56.010 and 2017 c 266 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:The following definitions are applicable in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:(1) "Access device" means any card, plate, code, account number, or other means of account access that can be used alone or in conjunction with another access device to obtain money, goods, services, or anything else of value, or that can be used to initiate a transfer of funds, other than a transfer originated solely by paper instrument;(2) "Appropriate lost or misdelivered property or services" means obtaining or exerting control over the property or services of another which the actor knows to have been lost or mislaid, or to have been delivered under a mistake as to identity of the recipient or as to the nature or amount of the property;(3) "Beverage crate" means a plastic or metal box-like container used by a manufacturer or distributor in the transportation or distribution of individually packaged beverages to retail outlets, and affixed with language stating "property of .Â .Â .Â .Â .," "owned by .Â .Â .Â .Â .," or other markings or words identifying ownership;(4) "By color or aid of deception" means that the deception operated to bring about the obtaining of the property or services; it is not necessary that deception be the sole means of obtaining the property or services;(5) "Deception" occurs when an actor knowingly:(a) Creates or confirms another's false impression which the actor knows to be false; or(b) Fails to correct another's impression which the actor previously has created or confirmed; or(c) Prevents another from acquiring information material to the disposition of the property involved; or(d) Transfers or encumbers property without disclosing a lien, adverse claim, or other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the property, whether that impediment is or is not valid, or is or is not a matter of official record; or(e) Promises performance which the actor does not intend to perform or knows will not be performed;(6) "Deprive" in addition to its common meaning means to make unauthorized use or an unauthorized copy of records, information, data, trade secrets, or computer programs;(7) "Mail," in addition to its common meaning, means any letter, postal card, package, bag, or other item that is addressed to a specific address for delivery by the United States postal service or any commercial carrier performing the function of delivering similar items to residences or businesses, provided the mail:(a)(i) Is addressed with a specific person's name, family name, or company, business, or corporation name on the outside of the item of mail or on the contents inside; and(ii) Is not addressed to a generic unnamed occupant or resident of the address without an identifiable person, family, or company, business, or corporation name on the outside of the item of mail or on the contents inside; and(b) Has been left for collection or delivery in any letter box, mailbox, mail receptacle, or other authorized depository for mail, or given to a mail carrier, or left with any private business that provides mailboxes or mail addresses for customers or when left in a similar location for collection or delivery by any commercial carrier; or(c) Is in transit with a postal service, mail carrier, letter carrier, commercial carrier, or that is at or in a postal vehicle, postal station, mailbox, postal airplane, transit station, or similar location of a commercial carrier; or(d) Has been delivered to the intended address, but has not been received by the intended addressee.Mail, for purposes of chapter 164, Laws of 2011, does not include magazines, catalogs, direct mail inserts, newsletters, advertising circulars, or any mail that is considered third-class mail by the United States postal service;(8) "Mailbox," in addition to its common meaning, means any authorized depository or receptacle of mail for the United States postal service or authorized depository for a commercial carrier that provides services to the general public, including any address to which mail is or can be addressed, or a place where the United States postal service or equivalent commercial carrier delivers mail to its addressee;(9) "Merchandise pallet" means a wood or plastic carrier designed and manufactured as an item on which products can be placed before or during transport to retail outlets, manufacturers, or contractors, and affixed with language stating "property ofÂ .Â .Â .," "owned byÂ .Â .Â .," or other markings or words identifying ownership;(10) "Obtain control over" in addition to its common meaning, means:(a) In relation to property, to bring about a transfer or purported transfer to the obtainer or another of a legally recognized interest in the property; or(b) In relation to labor or service, to secure performance thereof for the benefits of the obtainer or another;(11) "Owner" means a person, other than the actor, who has possession of or any other interest in the property or services involved, and without whose consent the actor has no authority to exert control over the property or services;(12) "Parking area" means a parking lot or other property provided by retailers for use by a customer for parking an automobile or other vehicle;(13) "Receive" includes, but is not limited to, acquiring title, possession, control, or a security interest, or any other interest in the property;(14) "Received by the intended addressee" means that the addressee, owner of the delivery mailbox, or authorized agent has removed the delivered mail from its delivery mailbox;(15) "Services" includes, but is not limited to, labor, professional services, transportation services, electronic computer services, the supplying of hotel accommodations, restaurant services, entertainment, the supplying of equipment for use, and the supplying of commodities of a public utility nature such as gas, electricity, steam, and water;(16) "Shopping cart" means a basket mounted on wheels or similar container generally used in a retail establishment by a customer for the purpose of transporting goods of any kind;(17) "Stolen" means obtained by theft, robbery, or extortion;(18) "Subscription television service" means cable or encrypted video and related audio and data services intended for viewing on a home television by authorized members of the public only, who have agreed to pay a fee for the service. Subscription services include but are not limited to those video services presently delivered by coaxial cable, fiber optic cable, terrestrial microwave, television broadcast, and satellite transmission;(19) "Telecommunication device" means (a) any type of instrument, device, machine, or equipment that is capable of transmitting or receiving telephonic or electronic communications; or (b) any part of such an instrument, device, machine, or equipment, or any computer circuit, computer chip, electronic mechanism, or other component, that is capable of facilitating the transmission or reception of telephonic or electronic communications;(20) "Telecommunication service" includes any service other than subscription television service provided for a charge or compensation to facilitate the transmission, transfer, or reception of a telephonic communication or an electronic communication;(21) Value. (a) "Value" means the market value of the property or services at the time and in the approximate area of the criminal act.(b) Whether or not they have been issued or delivered, written instruments, except those having a readily ascertained market value, shall be evaluated as follows:(i) The value of an instrument constituting an evidence of debt, such as a check, draft, or promissory note, shall be deemed the amount due or collectible thereon or thereby, that figure ordinarily being the face amount of the indebtedness less any portion thereof which has been satisfied;(ii) The value of a ticket or equivalent instrument which evidences a right to receive transportation, entertainment, or other service shall be deemed the price stated thereon, if any; and if no price is stated thereon, the value shall be deemed the price of such ticket or equivalent instrument which the issuer charged the general public;(iii) The value of any other instrument that creates, releases, discharges, or otherwise affects any valuable legal right, privilege, or obligation shall be deemed the greatest amount of economic loss which the owner of the instrument might reasonably suffer by virtue of the loss of the instrument;(iv) The value of a gift card or gift card redemption information shall be deemed the greatest amount of economic loss the owner of the gift card or gift card redemption information might reasonably suffer, including the full monetary face value or potential value for open-loop gift cards.(c) Except as provided in RCW 9A.56.340(4) and 9A.56.350(4), whenever any series of transactions which constitute theft, would, when considered separately, constitute theft in the third degree because of value, and said series of transactions are a part of a criminal episode or a common scheme or plan, then the transactions may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all said transactions shall be the value considered in determining the degree of theft involved.For purposes of this subsection, "criminal episode" means a series of thefts committed by the same person from one or more mercantile establishments on three or more occasions within a five-day period.(d) Whenever any person is charged with possessing stolen property and such person has unlawfully in his possession at the same time the stolen property of more than one person, then the stolen property possessed may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all said stolen property shall be the value considered in determining the degree of theft involved. Thefts committed by the same person in different counties that have been aggregated in one county may be prosecuted in any county in which one of the thefts occurred.(e) Property or services having value that cannot be ascertained pursuant to the standards set forth above shall be deemed to be of a value not exceeding two hundred and fifty dollars;(22) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person eighteen years of age or older who:(a) Is functionally, mentally, or physically unable to care for himself or herself; or(b) Is suffering from a cognitive impairment other than voluntary intoxication;(23) "Wrongfully obtains" or "exerts unauthorized control" means:(a) To take the property or services of another;(b) Having any property or services in one's possession, custody or control as bailee, factor, lessee, pledgee, renter, servant, attorney, agent, employee, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, or officer of any person, estate, association, or corporation, or as a public officer, or person authorized by agreement or competent authority to take or hold such possession, custody, or control, to secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her own use or to the use of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto; or(c) Having any property or services in one's possession, custody, or control as partner, to secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her use or to the use of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto, where the use is unauthorized by the partnership agreement;(24) "Cardholder" means any person or party to whom a physical or digital gift card is issued through a purchase, or who receives a gift card from a willing party;(25) "Card issuer" means any person that issues a gift card or the agent of that person with respect to the card;(26) "Closed-loop gift card" means a card, code, or device that is issued to a consumer on a prepaid basis primarily for personal, family, or household purposes in a specified amount, regardless of whether that amount may be increased or reloaded in exchange for payment and is redeemable upon presentation by a consumer at a single merchant or group of affiliated merchants;(27) "Gift card" means a physical or digital closed-loop gift card or open-loop gift card that is either activated or not yet activated;(28) "Gift card redemption information" means information unique to each gift card which allows the cardholder to access, transfer, or spend the funds on that gift card;(29) "Gift card seller" means a merchant that is engaged in the business of selling open-loop or closed-loop gift cards to consumers;(30) "Open-loop gift card" means a card, code, or device that is issued to a consumer on a prepaid basis primarily for personal, family, or household purposes in a specified amount, regardless of whether that amount may be increased or reloaded in exchange for payment, and is redeemable upon presentation at multiple unaffiliated merchants for goods or services within the payment card network.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 9A.56 RCW to read as follows:(1) Any person who, with intent to defraud, acquires or retains possession of a gift card or gift card redemption information without the consent of the cardholder, card issuer, or gift card seller, is guilty of theft of a gift card as follows:(a) Theft of a gift card is a first degree offense and class B felony if the value of the gift card or gift card redemption information exceeds $5,000 in value.(b) Theft of a gift card is a second degree offense and class C felony if the value of the gift card or gift card redemption information exceeds $750 in value but does not exceed $5,000 in value.(c) Theft of a gift card is a third degree offense and gross misdemeanor if the value of the gift card or gift card redemption information does not exceed $750 in value.(2) Any person who, with intent to defraud, uses, for the purpose of obtaining money, goods, services, or anything else of value, a gift card or gift card redemption information that has been obtained in violation of subsection (1) of this section or RCW 9A.60.020(1)(c) is guilty of unlawful use of a gift card as follows:(a) Unlawful use of a gift card is a first degree offense and class B felony if the value of the gift card or gift card redemption information exceeds $5,000 in value.(b) Unlawful use of a gift card is a second degree offense and class C felony if the value of the gift card or gift card redemption information exceeds $750 in value but does not exceed $5,000 in value.(c) Unlawful use of a gift card is a third degree offense and gross misdemeanor if the value of the gift card or gift card redemption information does not exceed $750 in value.Sec. 3. RCW 9A.60.020 and 2011 c 336 s 382 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of forgery if, with intent to injure or defraud:(a) He or she falsely makes, completes, or alters a written instrument ((or));(b) He or she possesses, utters, offers, disposes of, or puts off as true a written instrument which he or she knows to be forged; or(c) He or she alters or tampers with a gift card or gift card redemption information.(2) In a proceeding under this section that is related to an identity theft under RCW 9.35.020, the crime will be considered to have been committed in any locality where the person whose means of identification or financial information was appropriated resides, or in which any part of the offense took place, regardless of whether the defendant was ever actually in that locality.(3) Forgery is a class C felony.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 9A.60 RCW to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of gift card fraud if he or she devises a scheme to obtain a gift card or gift card redemption information from a cardholder, card issuer, or gift card seller by means of false or fraudulent pretenses, representations, or promises.(2) Gift card fraud is a class C felony.Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2024 c 301 s 29 and 2024 c 55 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Â TABLE 2Â Â CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVELÂ XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)Â XVHomicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)Â Â Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))Â Â Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)Â XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)Â Â Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))Â XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))Â Â Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))Â XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)Â Â Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)Â Â Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))Â Â Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)Â Â Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)Â Â Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)Â Â Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(3))Â XIManslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)Â Â Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)Â Â Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)Â Â Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)Â Â Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)Â XChild Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)Â Â Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)Â Â Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))Â Â Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)Â Â Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))Â Â Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))Â Â Sexually Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)Â IXAbandonment of Dependent Person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)Â Â Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)Â Â Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)Â Â Hit and RunâDeath (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))Â Â Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 79A.60.050)Â Â Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))Â Â Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))Â Â Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)Â Â Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)Â VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)Â Â Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.100)Â Â Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 79A.60.050)Â Â Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)Â Â Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)Â Â Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)Â VIIAir bag diagnostic systems (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(2)(b))Â Â Air bag replacement requirements (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(1)(b))Â Â Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)Â Â Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)Â Â Civil Disorder Training (RCW 9A.48.120)Â Â Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)Â Â Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.050(1))Â Â Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)Â Â False Reporting 1 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(a))Â Â Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)Â Â Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))Â Â Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)Â Â Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))Â Â Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.650(1)(b))Â Â Negligently Causing Death By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.675)Â Â Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(b))Â Â Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.060(1))Â Â Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))Â Â Use of a Machine Gun or Bump-fire Stock in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)Â Â Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)Â VIBail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))Â Â Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)Â Â Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))Â Â Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)Â Â Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)Â Â Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))Â Â Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))Â Â Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)Â Â Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)Â Â Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 1 (RCW 9A.56.400(1))Â Â Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)Â VAbandonment of Dependent Person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)Â Â Advancing money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)Â Â Air bag diagnostic systems (RCW 46.37.660(2)(c))Â Â Air bag replacement requirements (RCW 46.37.660(1)(c))Â Â Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))Â Â Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)Â Â Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)Â Â Custodial Sexual Misconduct 2 (RCW 9A.44.170)Â Â Dealing in Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))Â Â Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 7.105.450, 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.26B.050, or 26.52.070)Â Â Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)Â Â Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)Â Â Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)Â Â Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))Â Â Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)Â Â Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (RCW 46.37.650(1)(c))Â Â Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)Â Â Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)Â Â Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)Â Â Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)Â Â Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)Â Â Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(c))Â Â Sending, Bringing into State Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.060(2))Â Â Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)Â Â Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)Â Â Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)Â Â Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)Â IVArson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)Â Â Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)Â Â Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031(1)(h))Â Â Assault 4 (third domestic violence offense) (RCW 9A.36.041(3))Â Â Assault by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)Â Â Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)Â Â Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)Â Â Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)Â Â Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))Â Â Driving While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.502(6))Â Â Endangerment with a Controlled Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)Â Â Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)Â Â Hate Crime (RCW 9A.36.080)Â Â Hit and RunâInjury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))Â Â Hit and Run with VesselâInjury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))Â Â Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))Â Â Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age 14 (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)Â Â Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)Â Â Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))Â Â Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))Â Â Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)Â Â Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)Â Â Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)Â Â Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)Â Â Trafficking in Catalytic Converters 1 (RCW 9A.82.190)Â Â Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.82.050)Â Â Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(b))Â Â Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health care service contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))Â Â Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health maintenance organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))Â Â Unlawful transaction of insurance business (RCW 48.15.023(3))Â Â Unlicensed practice as an insurance professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))Â Â Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))Â Â Vehicle Prowling 2 (third or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.52.100(3))Â Â Vehicular Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)Â Â Viewing of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))Â IIIAnimal Cruelty 1 (RCW 16.52.205)Â Â Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace Officer With a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except subsection (1)(h))Â Â Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)Â Â Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))Â Â Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)Â Â Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)Â Â Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)Â Â Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)Â Â Cyber Harassment (RCW 9A.90.120(2)(b))Â Â Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)Â Â Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)Â Â False Reporting 2 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(b))Â Â Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)Â Â Hazing (RCW 28B.10.901(2)(b))Â Â Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)Â Â Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)Â Â Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)Â Â Manufacture of Untraceable Firearm with Intent to Sell (RCW 9.41.190)Â Â Manufacture or Assembly of an Undetectable Firearm or Untraceable Firearm (RCW 9.41.325)Â Â Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)Â Â Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily Harm By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.674)Â Â Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.350(2))Â Â Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)Â Â Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)Â Â Possession of Machine Gun, Bump-Fire Stock, Undetectable Firearm, or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)Â Â Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)Â Â Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 1 (RCW 9A.56.360(2))Â Â Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)Â Â Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)Â Â Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230(2))Â Â Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)Â Â Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW 9A.56.340(2))Â Â Trafficking in Catalytic Converters 2 (RCW 9A.82.200)Â Â Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.82.055)Â Â Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)Â Â Unlawful Misbranding of Fish or Shellfish 1 (RCW 77.140.060(3))Â Â Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))Â Â Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.120(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))Â Â Vehicular Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.522)Â IICommercial Fishing Without a License 1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))Â Â Computer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.90.040)Â Â Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))Â Â Electronic Data Service Interference (RCW 9A.90.060)Â Â Electronic Data Tampering 1 (RCW 9A.90.080)Â Â Electronic Data Theft (RCW 9A.90.100)Â Â Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))Â Â Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)Â Â Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)Â Â Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)Â Â Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))Â Â Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)Â Â Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)Â Â Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.350(3))Â Â Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)Â Â Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068)Â Â Possession, sale, or offering for sale of seven or more unmarked catalytic converters (RCW 9A.82.180(5))Â Â Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 2 (RCW 9A.56.360(3))Â Â Scrap Processing, Recycling, or Supplying Without a License (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 19.290.100)Â Â Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)Â Â Theft of a Gift Card 1 (section 2(1)(a) of this act)Â Â Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065)Â Â Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $5,000 or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))Â Â Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW 9A.56.340(3))Â Â Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)Â Â Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(a))Â Â Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians in Indian Fishery (RCW 77.15.570(2))Â Â Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)Â Â Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License (RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 2 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(a))Â Â Unlawful Use of a Gift Card 1 (section 2(2)(a) of this act)Â Â Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))Â Â Voyeurism 1 (RCW 9A.44.115)Â IAttempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)Â Â False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)Â Â Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)Â Â Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a Mental Health Advance Directive (RCW 9A.60.060)Â Â Gift Card Fraud (section 4 of this act)Â Â Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)Â Â Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)Â Â Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)Â Â Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)Â Â Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.450(3)(b))Â Â Suspension of Department Privileges 1 (RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))Â Â Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)Â Â Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)Â Â Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 2 (RCW 9A.56.400(2))Â Â Theft of a Gift Card 2 (section 2(1)(b) of this act)Â Â Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $750 or more but less than $5,000) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(b))Â Â Transaction of insurance business beyond the scope of licensure (RCW 48.17.063)Â Â Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch Accounting (RCW 77.15.630(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)Â Â Unlawful Possession of Fictitious Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Possession of Instruments of Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Possession of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Possession of a Personal Identification Device (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Production of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Releasing, Planting, Possessing, or Placing Deleterious Exotic Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))Â Â Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.142)Â Â Unlawful Use of a Gift Card 2 (section 2(2)(b) of this act)Â Â Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.144)Â Â Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1 (RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))Â Â Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)Â Â Violating Commercial Fishing Area or Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))Â --- END ---